Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-430
Punishment; limitation.

The punishment which a court-martial may direct for an offense may not exceed such limits as the Governor may prescribe for that offense.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 30, p. 1567.